Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 29.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8929
Criminal penalty.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally engages in distribution of veterinary legend drugs in this state in violation of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act is guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 29.
December 1, 2008